Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 5 Dentists
63-5-111. Examinations — Issuance or denial of licenses.

The board may conduct examinations at such times and places as it may designate and charge each examinee a fee for each examination taken as set annually by the board.

The examination may be written or oral, or both, shall include subjects as may be designated by the board and may also include practical tests, working operations and demonstrations, within the discretion of the board.

The board shall recognize a certificate granted by the American Dental Association's Commission on National Board Dental Examinations and may accept the results of its own board examination or the results of an examination conducted by one (1) or more of the regional testing agencies.

If the applicant shall successfully pass the examination and shall be found worthy, the board shall direct the division to issue a license to that applicant.

The board may, within its discretion, refuse to grant a certificate to any person found guilty of making false statements, cheating or of any fraud or deception, either in applying for or in taking the examination.

The board may, within its discretion, refuse to issue a license to any person who fails to apply for the same within ninety (90) days following notification of successful completion of all requirements for the licensure.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 12; 1965, ch. 216, § 4; 1969, ch. 29, § 4; 1976, ch. 497, § 2; 1978, ch. 824, § 9; 1981, ch. 99, § 7; T.C.A., § 63-540; Acts 1984, ch. 608, § 2; 1984, ch. 937, §§ 24, 25; 1989, ch. 523, § 11; 2002, ch. 771, § 8.

63-5-112. Specialists.

No licensed dentist shall claim to the public to be a specialist, or be specially qualified in any particular branch of dentistry or to be giving special attention to any branch of dentistry, or claim to limit the dentist's practice to any branch of dentistry, until that dentist has complied with the additional requirements established by the board and has been issued a certificate by the board authorizing that dentist so to do. The board is authorized to certify “specialists” in the following branches of dentistry:

Dental public health;

Endodontics;

Oral and maxillofacial pathology;

Oral and maxillofacial surgery;

Orthodontics and dentofacial orthopedics;

Pediatric dentistry;

Periodontics;

Prosthodontics;

Oral and maxillofacial radiology; and

Any other branch of dentistry hereafter recognized as a specialty by the American Dental Association and approved by the board.

Oral and maxillofacial surgeons are held to the same standard of care as physicians licensed under chapters 6 or 9 of this title.

In considering or acting upon matters related to specialists or special areas of dentistry, the board shall utilize as consultants one (1) or more knowledgeable persons certified in the applicable specialty or knowledgeable in the special area.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 13; 1969, ch. 29, § 5; 1981, ch. 99, § 8; T.C.A., § 63-541; Acts 1988, ch. 635, § 11; 1996, ch. 766, § 1; 2001, ch. 330, § 6; 2003, ch. 237, § 5.

Cross-References. Advertising pursuant to board certification and speciality, § 63-1-145.

63-5-113. Examination and certification of specialists.

Any dentist duly licensed in this state who has completed a minimum of two (2) years of graduate education in a dental school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation or the equivalent thereof in a specialty branch of dentistry or who has otherwise met the requirements of the rules promulgated by the board may apply for a certificate as a specialist.

The board may recognize specialty certification of those dentists licensed through the licensure criteria provisions of § 63-5-110, if the requirements for certification in the original state are substantially equivalent to those requirements in this state.

No one shall offer or conduct any school, course, or program that grants credentialed status or that graduates individuals for credentialed status, or its equivalent, in any particular branch of dentistry or any specific area of the practice of dentistry that is not listed as a recognized specialty in § 63-5-112. Dental, dental hygiene, and dental assisting colleges, schools, or programs in this state that are accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation are exempt from this subsection (c).

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 14; 1969, ch. 29, § 6; 1978, ch. 824, § 10; 1981, ch. 99, § 9; T.C.A., § 63-542; Acts 1988, ch. 635, §§ 12, 13; 1989, ch. 523, § 12; 1997, ch. 497, § 1; 2004, ch. 720, § 1; 2015, ch. 194, § 1.

63-5-114. Dental hygienists — Examination — Licensure — Reciprocity.

The board is authorized to issue a license to practice dental hygiene to applicants who are citizens of the United States or Canada or who are legally entitled to live within the United States, who have graduated and received a diploma from a dental hygiene program accredited by the American Dental Association's Commission on Dental Accreditation, that provides a minimum of two (2) academic years of dental hygiene curriculum and that may be completed in a period of time less than two (2) years, in or through an institution of higher education accredited by an agency recognized by the United States department of education to offer college-level programs and who have successfully passed such examinations as may be established by the board. The board may recognize a certificate granted by the joint commission of national dental examinations or accept the results of the southern regional testing agency, or either organization, in lieu of or subject to such examinations as may be required by the board.

Each applicant for a license as a dental hygienist shall pay a nonrefundable application fee to the board, as set annually by the board.

Any applicant submitting to an examination conducted by the board shall, in addition to the application fee, pay a nonrefundable examination fee as set annually by the board.

The license shall be of the type and kind agreed upon by the board.

The secretary of the board shall keep a separate register showing the names and addresses of all dental hygienists so licensed by the board.

The board is authorized in its discretion to issue a license by criteria approval to any dental hygienist who:

Is licensed and has, pursuant to that license, actively engaged in practice for three (3) years or more in another state or states;

Is a graduate of and has received a diploma from a dental hygiene program accredited by the American Dental Association's Commission on Dental Accreditation that provides a minimum of two (2) academic years of dental hygiene curriculum and that may be completed in a period of time less than two (2) years, in or through an institution of higher education accredited by an agency recognized by the United States department of education to offer college-level programs; and

Submits satisfactory evidence of good moral character and professional competence, including a certificate to that effect from the licensing or registration board from all states in which the applicant has held a license, upon payment of a nonrefundable fee as set by the board.

The board is authorized in its discretion to issue a limited license for educational purposes to any dental hygienist who is duly licensed or registered to practice in any other state, who meets the requirements of the board and who submits satisfactory evidence of good moral character and professional competence, including a certificate to that effect from the licensing or registration board from all states in which the applicant has held a license, upon payment of a nonrefundable fee as set by the board.

The board may in its discretion revoke a license to any person who fails to register the license with the board within ninety (90) days following notification of licensure.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 15; 1976, ch. 497, § 4; 1978, ch. 824, § 11; 1981, ch. 99, § 10; T.C.A., § 63-543; Acts 1984, ch. 608, § 3; 1988, ch. 635, §§ 14-16; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 13-15; 1990, ch. 1031, §§ 14-18; 1999, ch. 291, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-107.

63-5-115. Employment of and practice by hygienists and assistants.

A duly licensed and registered dentist may employ licensed and registered dental hygienists, registered dental assistants and practical dental assistants. Such licensed and registered dental hygienists may practice as authorized in this section or § 63-5-108 only in the office of and under the direct and/or general supervision of a licensed and registered dentist, in authorized public health programs or at other locations otherwise authorized by this chapter. Such registered and/or practical dental assistants may practice as authorized in this section or § 63-5-108 only in the office of and under the direct supervision of a licensed and registered dentist except in authorized public health programs. No provisions in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing any licensed and registered dental hygienists, registered dental assistants or practical dental assistants to practice as such except as provided in this section.

Definitions.

Direct Supervision. As used in this chapter regarding supervision of licensed and registered dental hygienists or registered dental assistants, “direct supervision” means the continuous presence of a supervising dentist within the physical confines of the dental office when licensed and registered dental hygienists or registered dental assistants perform lawfully assigned duties and functions;

General Supervision. As used in this chapter, “general supervision” is defined as those instances when the dentist is not present in the dental office or treatment facility while procedures are being performed by the dental hygienist, but the dentist has personally diagnosed the condition to be treated, has personally authorized the procedures being performed and will evaluate the performance of the dental hygienist.

Licensed and registered dental hygienists and registered dental assistants are specifically permitted to participate unsupervised in educational functions involving organized groups or health care institutions regarding preventive oral health care. Dental hygienists are permitted to participate in health screenings and similar activities; provided, that no remuneration is given by the organized group to any hygienist or the hygienist's employer for participating in these activities.

Settings in which licensed and registered hygienists may engage in the provision of preventive dental care under the general supervision of a dentist through written protocol include nursing homes, skilled care facilities, nonprofit clinics and public health programs. Dental hygienists licensed and registered pursuant to this chapter are specifically permitted to render such preventive services as authorized in § 63-5-108 or by regulation of the board, as prescribed by the supervising dentist under a written protocol. Dental hygienists rendering such services shall be under the general supervision of a licensed dentist as specified in a written protocol between the supervising dentist and the hygienist which must be submitted in advance to the board. No dentist may enter into a written protocol with more than three (3) dental hygienists at any one time nor may any hygienist be engaged in a written protocol with more than three (3) dentists at any one time. The supervising dentist must process all patient billings. Each written protocol will be valid for a period of two (2) years at which time it must be renewed through resubmission to the board. Should a dentist cease to be the employer/supervisor of a dental hygienist where a written protocol is in force and on file with the board, the dentist must notify the board within ten (10) working days by certified mail, return receipt requested or electronic mail that the written protocol is no longer in force.

Licensed and registered dental hygienists working under written protocol, in addition to those requirements enumerated under the general supervision as authorized by § 63-5-108(c)(5), must have actively practiced as a licensed dental hygienist for at least five (5) years and have practiced two thousand (2,000) hours in the preceding five (5) years or taught dental hygiene courses for two (2) of the proceeding three (3) years in a dental hygiene program accredited by the American Dental Association's Commission on Dental Accreditation and completed six (6) hours of public health continuing education within the past two (2) years; provided, that, after satisfying the requirement of this subsection (d), in subsequent years the hygienist may work on a part-time basis.

Each written protocol, required for off-site practice under general supervision, shall be submitted to the board by certified mail, return receipt requested and shall include at a minimum:

The name, address, telephone number and license number of the employer (supervising) dentist;

The name, address, telephone number and license number of the dental hygienist;

The name, address, telephone number and other pertinent identification from all locations where the dental hygiene services are to be performed; and

A statement signed by the dentist that the dentist and the dental hygienist that meets all minimum standards for general supervision as well as those required for practice under a written protocol as stipulated in this section and § 63-5-108.

The board will receive each written protocol submitted and keep those on file which meet the minimum requirements enumerated in subdivision (d)(3). Those received by the board and determined not to be complete shall be returned to the submitting dentist within thirty (30) days of receipt with a request for the additional information required. The dentist may then resubmit an amended written protocol to the board.

Teledentistry shall not alter or amend the supervision requirements or procedures authorized for licensed and registered dental hygienists or registered dental assistants. Any licensed and registered dental hygienist who, under the supervision of a dentist, assists the dentist in providing dental health services or care using teledentistry is only authorized to perform those services that the dental hygienist is authorized to perform during an in-person patient encounter under general supervision. Services provided by registered dental hygienists through teledentistry should be provided under written protocol in accordance with subsection (d).

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 16; 1978, ch. 824, § 12; T.C.A., § 63-544; Acts 1988, ch. 635, § 17; 1990, ch. 1031, § 19; 1998, ch. 847, §§ 4, 5; 1999, ch. 405, § 3; 2012, ch. 945, §§ 2, 3; 2016, ch. 918, § 2.

63-5-116. Penalties for unauthorized practice by hygienist or assistant.

The board may revoke or suspend the license of, assess a civil penalty for each separate violation against or otherwise lawfully discipline any dentist who permits any licensed and registered dental hygienist, registered dental assistant and/or practical dental assistant operating under that dentist's supervision to perform any acts or services other than those authorized by this chapter.

The board may also revoke or suspend the license or registration of, assess a civil penalty for each separate violation against or otherwise lawfully discipline any dental hygienist or dental assistant violating any of the provisions of this chapter.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 17; 1978, ch. 824, § 13; 1981, ch. 99, § 11; T.C.A., § 63-545; Acts 1990, ch. 1031, §§ 20, 21; 1999, ch. 405, § 4; 2001, ch. 330, § 7.

Cross-References. Discipline generally, § 63-5-124.

Penalties, §§ 63-1-123, 63-1-134.

63-5-117. License renewal.

Each licensed dentist shall pay an annual renewal fee to the board, payable in advance. The secretary of the board shall notify each licensed dentist that such renewal fee is due.

Each licensed dental hygienist shall pay an annual renewal fee to the board as set by the board, payable in advance, for the ensuing year on or before December 31 of each year, which fees shall become part of the fees of the board and handled in the same manner as other fees of the board. The secretary shall notify all licensed dental hygienists prior to December 31 of each year that the fee is due.

Each registered dental assistant shall pay a biennial renewal fee to the board as set by the board, payable in advance, for the ensuing two (2) years on or before December 31 of each even year, which fees shall become a part of the fees of the board to be handled in the same manner as other fees of the board. The secretary shall notify all registered dental assistants prior to December 31 of each even year that such fee is due.

When any licensed dentist, licensed dental hygienist or registered dental assistant fails to register and pay the registration fee within sixty (60) days after registration becomes due as provided in this section, the license or certificate of such person shall be automatically revoked at the expiration of sixty (60) days after the registration was required, without further notice or hearing. Any person whose license or certificate is automatically revoked as provided in this subsection (d) may make application in writing to the Tennessee board of dental examiners for the reinstatement of such license or certificate, and, upon good cause being shown, the board in its discretion may reinstate such license or certificate upon payment of all past-due renewal fees and upon the further payment of a sum as set by the board.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the division, with the approval of the commissioner, shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months and shall expire on the last day of the last month of the license period; however, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the board determines that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in subdivision (e)(1).

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 18; 1965, ch. 216, § 1; 1969, ch. 29, § 7; 1976, ch. 406, § 5; 1976, ch. 497, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-546; Acts 1985, ch. 71, §§ 3-6; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 20-22; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 16-19; 1990, ch. 1031, §§ 22, 23.

Cross-References. Registration, § 63-1-108.

63-5-118. Certificate to licensee removing from state.

Anyone who is licensed or certified and is an ethical practitioner of dentistry or dental hygiene in the state and who is of good moral character, who shall desire to change residence to another state, territory, the District of Columbia or to a foreign country, upon application to the board, shall receive a special certificate or endorsement signed by the secretary and bearing the seal of the board, which shall attest such facts, the date of licensure or certification and such other facts as may be deemed necessary. The nonrefundable fee for each certificate or endorsement shall be set by the board.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 19; 1973, ch. 166, § 5; 1978, ch. 824, § 14; T.C.A., § 63-547; Acts 1989, ch. 523, § 20.

Cross-References. Certificate of fitness for license in other state, § 63-1-118.

63-5-119. Disbursement of fees, fines and penalties — Operating expenses — Compensation — Conference attendance.

All fees coming into the hands of the board, including examination fees, renewal fees, fines and penalties, shall be paid by the board to the state treasurer and become part of the general fund. The commissioner of finance and administration shall make allotments out of the general fund of at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the funds paid into the general fund by the board for the proper expenditures of the board, and no expenditure shall be made by the board until allotment for the expenditure has been made by the commissioner. Such allotments for the operation of the board shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of the state.

The members of the board shall receive as compensation the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day they are actually engaged in the duties of the board in Tennessee, and all necessary expenses incurred in attending the meetings of the board. All reimbursements for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

All fines, fees and penalties provided for in this chapter, whether imposed or required by the board or assessed or imposed by a court, judge or jury, shall belong to and be paid to the board.

The secretary of the board shall, in addition to the per diem provided by this section, receive a salary not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per month as set annually by the board.

The board may select one (1) or more of its members to attend, at the expense of the board, annual meetings of such agencies and associations as the Southern Regional Testing Agency, American Association of Dental Examiners and the Southern Conference of Dental Deans and Examiners, where attendance is necessary and important to the proper functioning of the board.

The members of the board may receive as compensation for attendance at such annual meetings the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day they are actually engaged in the duties of the board at such annual meetings.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 20; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1969, ch. 29, § 8; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(112); 1978, ch. 824, § 15; T.C.A., § 63-548; Acts 1994, ch. 666, § 1.

Cross-References. Disbursement of fine and penalties, operating expenses, § 63-1-113.

Funds, deposits and disbursements, § 63-1-137.

63-5-120. Exhibit of license.

The holder of the license to practice dentistry or dental hygiene shall, at all times, upon request, exhibit such license along with the annual renewal receipt to any of the members of the board, or its authorized agent, or to any officer of the law.

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 21; 1969, ch. 29, § 9; T.C.A., § 63-549; Acts 1990, ch. 1031, § 24.

63-5-121. Dental practice to be owned by dentist — Exception for death or disability.

Except where dental services are regularly made available to employees by their employer or where dental services are being provided by an official agency of the state government or any subdivision, any nonprofit organization or hospital, it is unlawful:

For any licensed dentist to practice dentistry as an employee of any person or other entity not engaged primarily in the practice of dentistry; or

For an owner of an active dental practice to be other than a dentist duly licensed to practice in this state.

In the event that a dentist is deceased or becomes substantially disabled, the estate or agent of such dentist may employ another dentist or dentists for a period of not more than two (2) years to provide services to patients until the practice can be sold or otherwise disposed of or closed.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a charitable clinic from employing or contracting with a dentist; provided, that the contractual relationship between the dentist and the charitable clinic is evidenced by a written contract, job description, or documentation, containing language that does not restrict the dentist from exercising independent professional judgment in diagnosing and treating patients.

For the purposes of this subsection (c), the term “charitable clinic” means an entity that meets the following standards:

Has received a determination of exemption from the internal revenue service under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) or is a distinct part of an entity that has received such a determination of exemption;

Has clinical facilities located in this state;

Has a primary mission to provide health care or dental care services to low-income, uninsured, or underserved individuals;

Provides one or more of the following services for free or at a discounted rate:

Medical care;

Dental care;

Mental health care; or

Prescription medications;

Utilizes volunteer healthcare professionals and nonclinical volunteers; and

Is not required to be licensed under § 68-11-202(a)(1).

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 22; 1981, ch. 99, § 12; T.C.A., § 63-550; Acts 2002, ch. 771, §§ 9, 10; 2016, ch. 766, § 1.

63-5-122. Drug prescriptions.

Licensed dentists of this state may dispense, prescribe or otherwise distribute drugs rational to the practice of dentistry, and any prescriptions shall be written in accordance with state and federal drug laws.

Licensed pharmacists of this state may fill prescriptions of licensed dentists of this state for any drug necessary or proper to the practice of dentistry.

Any handwritten prescription order for a drug prepared by a dentist who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legible so that it is comprehensible by the pharmacist who fills the prescription. The handwritten prescription order must contain the name of the prescribing dentist, the name and strength of the drug prescribed, the quantity of the drug prescribed, handwritten in letters or in numerals, instructions for the proper use of the drug, and the month and day that the prescription order was issued, recorded in letters or in numerals or a combination thereof. The prescribing dentist must sign the handwritten prescription order on the day it is issued, unless it is a standing order issued in a hospital, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201.

Any typed or computer-generated prescription order for a drug issued by a dentist who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legible so that it is comprehensible by the pharmacist who fills the prescription order. The typed or computer generated prescription order must contain the name of the prescribing dentist, the name and strength of the drug prescribed, the quantity of the drug prescribed, recorded in letters or in numerals, instructions for the proper use of the drug, and the month and day that the typed or computer generated prescription order was issued, recorded in letters or in numerals or a combination thereof. The prescribing dentist must sign the typed or computer generated prescription order on the day it is issued, unless it is a standing order issued in a hospital, nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a dentist from issuing a verbal prescription order.

All handwritten, typed or computer-generated prescription orders must be issued on either tamper-resistant prescription paper or printed utilizing a technology that results in a tamper-resistant prescription that meets the current centers for medicare and medicaid service guidance to state medicaid directors regarding § 7002(b) of the United States Troop Readiness, Veterans' Care, Katrina Recovery, and Iraq Accountability Appropriations Act of 2007, P.L. 110-28, and meets or exceeds specific TennCare requirements for tamper-resistant prescriptions.

Subdivision (f)(1) shall not apply to prescriptions written for inpatients of a hospital, outpatients of a hospital where the doctor or other person authorized to write prescriptions writes the order into the hospital medical record and then the order is given directly to the hospital pharmacy and the patient never has the opportunity to handle the written order, a nursing home or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201 or inpatients or residents of a mental health hospital or residential facility licensed under title 33 or individuals incarcerated in a local, state or federal correctional facility.

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 23; 1978, ch. 824, § 16; T.C.A., § 63-551; Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 4; 2005, ch. 12, § 2; 2008, ch. 1035, §§ 3, 9; 2010, ch. 795, §§ 2, 14; 2013, ch. 74, § 3; 2018, ch. 883, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 1 provided that the title of the act, which amended subsection (c) and subsections (d) and (e), is and may be cited as the “Medication Error Reduction Act of 2004.”

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 2 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly to create a uniform standard that health care providers must follow in issuing written or electronic prescription orders. This standard is intended to reduce medication related errors, which represent a major source of medical errors in the health care system. The general assembly finds that reducing medical errors will result in greater safety for patients as well as cost savings for the health care system in this state. By adopting these standards, the general assembly intends to promote medical safety for all patients who are issued drug prescriptions in this state.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 11 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner’s or pharmacist’s ability to order the use of or distribute non-prescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 12 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse’s ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 13 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of this act in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate health care providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 14 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before July 1, 2004.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner's or pharmacist's ability to order the use of or distribute non-prescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 9 provided that §§ 1-7 of the act shall not apply to prescriptions written for inpatients of a hospital, outpatients of a hospital where the physician or other person authorized to write prescriptions, writes the order into the hospital medical record and the patient or patient's agent or representative never has the opportunity to handle the written order, a nursing home, or an assisted care living facility as defined in § 68-11-201 or inpatients or residents of a mental health hospital or residential facility licensed under title 33 or individuals incarcerated in a local, state or federal correctional facility.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 10 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse's ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 11 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of the act in accordance with title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate healthcare providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2010, ch. 795, § 19 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before January 1, 2011.

Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 10 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, deleted former (g) which read: “Any written, printed or computer-generated order for a Schedule II controlled substance prepared by a dentist who is authorized by law to prescribe a drug must be legibly printed or typed as a separate prescription order. The written, printed or computer-generated order must contain all information otherwise required by law. The prescribing dentist must sign the written, printed or computer-generated order on the day it is issued.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 12. January 1, 2019; provided that for rulemaking purposes the act took effect May 3, 2018.

63-5-123. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 63-5-123 (Acts 1957, ch. 32, § 25; T.C.A., § 63-553; Acts 2002, ch. 771, § 11), concerning jury duty exemption for dentists, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 7, effective January 1, 2009.